North Carolina statutes. Constitution of North Carolina
Article XIII Conventions; Constitutional Amendment and Revision

§ 1. Convention of the People.

No Convention of the People of this State shall ever be called unless by the concurrence of two-thirds of all the members of each house of the General Assembly, and unless the proposition “Convention or No Convention” is first submitted to the qualified voters of the State at the time and in the manner prescribed by the General Assembly. If a majority of the votes cast upon the proposition are in favor of a Convention, it shall assemble on the day prescribed by the General Assembly. The General Assembly shall, in the act submitting the convention proposition, propose limitations upon the authority of the Convention; and if a majority of the votes cast upon the proposition are in favor of a Convention, those limitations shall become binding upon the Convention. Delegates to the Convention shall be elected by the qualified voters at the time and in the manner prescribed in the act of submission. The Convention shall consist of a number of delegates equal to the membership of the House of Representatives of the General Assembly that submits the convention proposition and the delegates shall be apportioned as is the House of Representatives. A Convention shall adopt no ordinance not necessary to the purpose for which the Convention has been called.

History.

1969, c. 1258, s. 1.

History Note.

The provisions of the first two sentences of this section are similar to those of Art. XIII, § 1, Const. 1868, as amended by the Convention of 1875.

Legal Periodicals.

For discussion as to whether this section applies to the calling of a Convention to consider a proposed federal amendment, see 11 N.C.L. Rev. 242 (1933).

§ 2. Power to revise or amend Constitution reserved to people.

The people of this State reserve the power to amend this Constitution and to adopt a new or revised Constitution. This power may be exercised by either of the methods set out hereinafter in this Article, but in no other way.

History.

1969, c. 1258, s. 1.

History Note.

This section is new with the Constitution of 1970.

Legal Periodicals.

For note on rejection of the “public purpose” requirement for State tax exemption, see 17 Wake Forest L. Rev. 293 (1981).

§ 3. Revision or amendment by Convention of the People.

A Convention of the People of this State may be called pursuant to Section 1 of this Article to propose a new or revised Constitution or to propose amendments to this Constitution. Every new or revised Constitution and every constitutional amendment adopted by a Convention shall be submitted to the qualified voters of the State at the time and in the manner prescribed by the Convention. If a majority of the votes cast thereon are in favor of ratification of the new or revised Constitution or the constitutional amendment or amendments, it or they shall become effective January first next after ratification by the qualified voters unless a different effective date is prescribed by the Convention.

History.

1969, c. 1258, s. 1.

History Note.

This section is new with the Constitution of 1970.

§ 4. Revision or amendment by legislative initiation.

A proposal of a new or revised Constitution or an amendment or amendments to this Constitution may be initiated by the General Assembly, but only if three-fifths of all the members of each house shall adopt an act submitting the proposal to the qualified voters of the State for their ratification or rejection. The proposal shall be submitted at the time and in the manner prescribed by the General Assembly. If a majority of the votes cast thereon are in favor of the proposed new or revised Constitution or constitutional amendment or amendments, it or they shall become effective January first next after ratification by the voters unless a different effective date is prescribed in the act submitting the proposal or proposals to the qualified voters.

History.

1969, c. 1258, s. 1.

History Note.

The provisions of this section are similar to those of Art. XIII, § 2, Const. 1868, as amended by the Convention of 1875.

Legal Periodicals.

For comment, “The States, Balanced Budgets, and Fundamental Shifts in Federalism,” see 82 N.C.L. Rev. 1195 (2004).